Georgia, session 2025_26, HB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to controlled
substances, is amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I controlled
substances, by revising subparagraph (TT) of paragraph (1) as follows:
"(TT) Methyl 2-methyl-AP-237;"
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I controlled
substances, by revising subparagraph (CC) of paragraph (3) as follows:
"(CC) Acetylpsilocin (4-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, 4-AcO-DMT); Reserved;"
H. B. 473
- 1 -

LC 48 1480/AP
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I controlled
substances, by adding a new subparagraph to paragraph (4) to read as follows:
"(A.5) Ethylphenidate;"
SECTION 4.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I controlled
substances, by adding a new subdivision to division (13)(E)(ii) to read as follows:
"(III) Tetrahydrothiophene group;"
SECTION 5.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-13-71, relating to dangerous drug, by
adding new paragraphs to subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(12.8) Acoramidis;"
"(17.07) Afamitresgene autoleucel;"
"(62.45) Aprocitentan;"
"(63.3) Arimoclomol;"
"(68.133) Atidarsagene autotemcel;"
"(69.23) Axatilimab-csfr;"
"(153.65) Ceftobiprole medocaril sodium;"
"(206.6) Coagulation Factor IX (recombinant);"
"(213.2) Concizumab-mtci;"
"(216.5) Cosibelimab-ipdl;"
"(217.3) Crinecerfont;"
"(220.5) Crovalimab-akkz;"
"(238.5) Danicopan;"
"(256.58) Deuruxolitinib;"
H. B. 473
- 2 -

LC 48 1480/AP
"(256.8) Deutivacaftor;"
"(316.45) Donanemab-azbt;"
"(331.0504) Eladocagene exuparvovec-tneq;
(331.0506) Elafibranor;"
"(331.0515) Elaparvovec-dzkt;"
"(332.3) Enmetazobactam;"
"(332.73) Ensartinib;
(332.75) Ensifentrine;"
"(380.45) Exagamglogene autotemcel;"
"(402.3) Flurpiridaz F 18;"
"(415.005) Givinostat;"
"(464.9) Imetelstat;"
"(466.8) Immune globulin, Human;"
"(469.02) Inavolisib;"
"(487.09) Iomeprol;"
"(512.1) Landiolol;"
"(513.03) Lazertinib;
(513.07) Lebrikizumab-lbkz;"
"(513.79) LetibotulinumtoxinA-wlbg;"
"(514.3) Levacetylleucine;"
"(520.1) Lifileucel;"
"(530.3) Lovotibeglogene autotemcel;"
"(540.47) Marstacimab-hncq;"
"(540.8) Mavorixafor;"
"(638.9) Nemolizumab-ilto;"
"(649) Nogapendekin alfa inbakicept-pmln;"
"(661.02) Obecabtagene autoleucel;"
H. B. 473
- 3 -

LC 48 1480/AP
"(663.03) Olezarsen;"
"(681.55) Palopegteriparatide;"
"(692.5175) Pegulicianine;"
"(835.7) Resmetirom;"
"(836.75) Revumenib;"
"(852.55) Seladelpar;"
"(860.5) Smallpox and mpox (vaccinia) vaccine;"
"(881.04) Sofpironium;"
"(883.55) Sotatercept-csrk;"
"(927.3) Sulopenem etzadroxil;"
"(931.17) Tarlatamab-dlle;"
"(967.625) Tislelizumab-jsgr;"
"(973.55) Tovorafenib;"
"(1021.65) Vadadustat;"
"(1025.3) Vanzacaftor;"
"(1037.4) Vorasidenib;"
"(1039.05) Xanomeline;"
"(1042.035) Zanidatamab-hrii;"
"(1042.047) Zenocutuzumab-zbco;"
"(1042.79) Zolbetuximab-clzb;"
SECTION 6.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-13-71, relating to dangerous drug, by
adding a new subparagraph to paragraph (59) of subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(ZZ.5) Peanut (arachis hypogaea) allergen powder-dnfp;"
H. B. 473
- 4 -

LC 48 1480/AP
SECTION 7.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 8.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 473
- 5 -